Utah statutes.
75-3-709.   Power to avoid transfers.

The property liable for the payment of unsecured debts of a decedent includes all property transferred by him by any means which is in law void or voidable as against his creditors, and subject to prior liens, the right to recover this property, so far as necessary for the payment of unsecured debts of the decedent, is exclusively in the personal representative. The personal representative is not required to institute such an action unless requested by creditors who must pay or secure the cost and expenses of litigation.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

